Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-401
Obstructions to air navigation; regulation; purpose.

There is hereby recognized, declared, and found (1) to exist, in behalf of the citizens of the United States, a public right of freedom of transit in air commerce through the air space of the State of Nebraska, (2) that any obstruction to air navigation (a) interferes with the public right of freedom of transit in air commerce, (b) endangers the lives and property of those using the air space for travel and transportation by air, and (c) endangers the lives and property of the occupants of land in the State of Nebraska, and (3) that the public health, safety, and welfare require that the erection and maintenance of obstructions to air navigation be regulated and controlled.

Laws 1955, c. 7, § 1, p. 67.